Maryland, session 2026, HB1283.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
21–1414.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Authority” means the Maryland Transportation Authority.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1283*

HOUSE BILL 1283
(11) “Video toll” means the amount assessed by the Authority when a video
toll transaction occurs.
(h) (1) The Authority may refer a delinquent account for unpaid video tolls and
associated civil penalties to the Central Collection Unit for collection.
(2) The Authority may recall a delinquent account from the Central
Collection Unit if:
(i) The delinquent account exceeds $300 in unpaid video tolls and
associated civil penalties;
(ii) The video tolls in question were assessed within a 30–day period;
or
(iii) Mitigating factors exist with respect to the assessment of the
unpaid video tolls and associated civil penalties, as determined by the Authority.
(3) (I) [Notwithstanding any other provision of law, until the Authority
refers the debt to the Central Collection Unit or after the Authority has recalled a
delinquent account from the Central Collection Unit, the] THE Authority may waive any
portion of the video toll due or civil penalty assessed ON A DELINQUENT ACCOUNT under
this section.
(II) IF THE AUTHORITY WAIVES ANY PORTION OF THE VIDEO
TOLL DUE OR CIVIL PENALTY ASSESSED:
1. THE AUTHORITY SHALL NOTIFY THE CENTRAL
COLLECTION UNIT OF THE AMOUNT OF THE REVISED DEBT; AND
2. THE CENTRAL COLLECTION UNIT SHALL REDUCE
THE FEE ASSESSED UNDER § 3–304(A) OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT
ARTICLE BASED ON THE AMOUNT OF THE REVISED DEBT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.